Utah statutes.
54-4-15.1.   Signals or devices at grade crossings -- Duty to provide.
The Department of Transportation so as to promote the public safety shall as
prescribed in this act provide for the installing, maintaining,
reconstructing, and improving of automatic and other safety appliances,
signals or devices at grade crossings on public highways or roads over the
tracks of any railroad or street railroad corporation in the state.
